Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201781-2,156
Hybrid seed corn; cross, defined.

The cross mentioned in section 81-2,155 shall be produced by cross fertilization performed by a method of proper isolation in time or distance and controlled either by hand, by detasseling at the proper times, or by utilizing male sterility systems.

Laws 1937, c. 4, § 2, p. 56;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-1824;

R.S.1943, § 81-2,156;

Laws 2017, LB276, § 2.